Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Division 1. Generally

§§ 35-7-601 through 35-7-609.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 173, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1913, ch. 109, §§ 1 through 7 and Laws 1929, ch. 91, §§ 1 and 2, related to general provisions on oleomargarine, and imitation butter and cheese.